Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-2311
Nonpermanent surface, defined.

Nonpermanent surface shall mean any ground consisting of uncovered dirt or rock or ground that is covered by grass or other plant life, crushed rock, gravel, or other similar natural substance.

Laws 1994, LB 421, § 11.